Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7503
Competition and uniformity; construction of act.

Nothing in the Property and Casualty Insurance Rate and Form Act shall prohibit or discourage reasonable competition or prohibit or discourage uniformity in policy forms, rating systems, or underwriting practices except to the extent necessary to accomplish the purposes of the act. The act shall be liberally interpreted to carry into effect the purposes of the act.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 3.